Louisiana, session 2026, HB914.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1807.14(A)(3)(f) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1807.14. Appraiser qualifications; conflicts of interest
A. To qualify as an appraiser, a person shall meet all of the following
criteria:
* * *
(3) Be any one of the following with an active license:
* * *
(f) A building consultant pursuant to R.S. 37:2156.5
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 37: 2150.1(25) and 2156.5 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2150.1. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-554 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 914
(25) "Building consultant" means any person who provides consultation that
includes; specialized advice, oversight, guidance, and evaluation related to the
design, construction, condition, performance, or repair of buildings.
* * *
§2156.5. Building consultants
A. On and after January 1, 2026, any person who advertises, solicits,
undertakes, attempts, offers, or submits a price, bid, quote or estimate to construct,
supervise, advise, direct, oversee, or perform any construction, modification, repair,
or maintenance of any portion of a building shall hold the classification of building
consultant.
B. A building consultant shall meet all of the following requirements:
(1) Pass the building consultant examination which shall be administered
by the board.
(2) Meet all other certification requirements of a building consultant.
(3) Pay the necessary fees to the board for building consultants.
(4) Be subject to the board for oversight, compliance, and sanctions.
C. Building consultant is a subclassification of residential construction.